Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1131.
do enact as follows:AB1131,11Section 1. 343.30 (1q) (b) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1131,3,32343.30 (1q) (b) 3. Except as provided in sub. (1r) or subd. 4m., if the number of 3convictions under ss. 940.09 (1) and 940.25 in the person’s lifetime, plus the total 4number of other convictions, suspensions, and revocations counted under s. 343.307 5(1) within a 10-year period, equals 2, the court shall revoke the person’s operating 6privilege for not less than one year nor more than 18 months. After the first 45 days 1of the revocation period has elapsed, the person is eligible for an occupational 2license under s. 343.10 if he or she has completed the assessment and is complying 3with the driver safety plan ordered under par. (c).AB1131,24Section 2. 343.301 (1g) (a) 2. a. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1131,3,65343.301 (1g) (a) 2. a. The person had an alcohol concentration of 0.15 0.08 or 6more at the time of the offense.AB1131,37Section 3. 343.305 (10) (b) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1131,3,168343.305 (10) (b) 3. Except as provided in subd. 4m., if the number of 9convictions under ss. 940.09 (1) and 940.25 in the person’s lifetime, plus the total 10number of other convictions, suspensions, and revocations counted under s. 343.307 11(2) within a 10-year period, equals 2, the court shall revoke the person’s operating 12privilege for 2 years. After the first 90 days of the revocation period or, if the total 13number of convictions, suspensions, and revocations counted under this subdivision 14within any 5-year period equals 2 or more, after one year of the revocation period 15has elapsed, the person is eligible for an occupational license under s. 343.10 if he or 16she has completed the assessment and is complying with the driver safety plan.AB1131,417Section 4. 343.307 (1) (h) of the statutes is created to read:AB1131,3,2018343.307 (1) (h) Convictions for violations under s. 125.07 (4) (a) 2. or (b) or a 19local ordinance in conformity with that section that involve the violator consuming 20alcohol beverages and operating a motor vehicle.AB1131,521Section 5. 343.31 (3) (bm) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1131,4,922343.31 (3) (bm) 3. Except as provided in subd. 4m., if the number of 23convictions under ss. 940.09 (1) and 940.25 in the person’s lifetime, plus the total 24number of suspensions, revocations, and other convictions counted under s. 343.307 1(1) within a 10-year period, equals 2, the department shall revoke the person’s 2operating privilege for not less than one year nor more than 18 months. If an 3Indian tribal court in this state revokes the person’s privilege to operate a motor 4vehicle on tribal lands for not less than one year nor more than 18 months for the 5conviction specified in par. (bm) (intro.), the department shall impose the same 6period of revocation. After the first 60 days of the revocation period or, if the total 7number of convictions, suspensions, and revocations counted under this subdivision 8within any 5-year period equals 2 or more, after one year of the revocation period 9has elapsed, the person is eligible for an occupational license under s. 343.10.AB1131,610Section 6. 346.65 (2) (am) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1131,4,1711346.65 (2) (am) 2. Except as provided in pars. (bm) and (f), shall be fined not 12less than $350 nor more than $1,100 and imprisoned for not less than 5 days nor 13more than 6 months if the number of convictions under ss. 940.09 (1) and 940.25 in 14the person’s lifetime, plus the total number of suspensions, revocations, and other 15convictions counted under s. 343.307 (1) within a 10-year period, equals 2, except 16that suspensions, revocations, or convictions arising out of the same incident or 17occurrence shall be counted as one.AB1131,718Section 7. 346.65 (2) (bm) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1131,5,619346.65 (2) (bm) In any county that opts to offer a reduced minimum period of 20imprisonment for the successful completion of a probation period that includes 21alcohol and other drug treatment, if the number of convictions under ss. 940.09 (1) 22and 940.25 in the person’s lifetime, plus the total number of suspensions, 23revocations, and other convictions counted under s. 343.307 (1) within a 10-year 24period, equals 2, except that suspensions, revocations, or convictions arising out of 1the same incident or occurrence shall be counted as one, the fine shall be the same 2as under par. (am) 2., but the period of imprisonment shall be not less than 5 days, 3except that if the person successfully completes a period of probation that includes 4alcohol and other drug treatment, the period of imprisonment shall be not less than 55 nor more than 7 days. A person may be sentenced under this paragraph or under 6par. (cm) or (dm) or sub. (2j) (bm), (cm), or (cr) or (3r) once in his or her lifetime.AB1131,87Section 8. Initial applicability.AB1131,5,118(1) This act first applies to violations committed on the effective date of this 9subsection but does not preclude the counting of other convictions, suspensions, or 10revocations as prior convictions, suspensions, or revocations for purposes of 11administrative action by the department of transportation or sentencing by a court.AB1131,5,1212